Maine, session 132, LD1780.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 15 MRSA §1322 is enacted to read:
§1322. Witnesses other than defendant
1. Request for statement. Any person, other than the defendant, with information
relevant to the proceeding shall give a statement upon request of the defendant. The
defendant may obtain the statement of the person by serving a written notice of statement
upon the person whose statement is sought and upon the prosecution no later than 14 days
before the date scheduled for the statement.
2. Notice of statement. The notice of statement under this section must state the time
and place for the taking of the statement along with a description of the information sought
in the statement or any materials to be examined. The defendant issuing the notice shall
make reasonable efforts to confer with the person whose statement is requested in good
faith regarding scheduling of a statement before serving a notice of statement. The notice
of statement must describe the method by which the statement must be recorded, which
may be by audio recording, audiovisual recording or stenographic means. A statement may
be taken in person, by telephone or by remote electronic means.
3. Process. A notice of statement under this section, and the taking of the statement,
are governed by the following procedures:
A. A subpoena must be served with the notice of statement to secure the presence of
the person and any materials to be examined during the statement. A copy of the
subpoena and the notice of statement must be sent to the prosecution and filed with the
court;
B. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in subsection 1 or 2, if a defendant is
charged with a crime under Title 17-A, chapter 9 and the victim of that crime is a family
or household member as defined by Title 19-A, section 4102, subsection 6 and it is the
victim's statement that is sought, then the subpoena and notice of statement must be
served upon the District Attorney's office handling that prosecution and not directly
upon the victim. The State shall provide the notice and subpoena to the victim.
(1) A notice under this paragraph must be served upon the District Attorney's office
no later than 45 days before the date scheduled for the statement.
(2) The State shall provide certification to the defendant and the court that the
notice and subpoena were provided to the victim no later than 14 days before the
date scheduled for the statement.
(3) Statements taken from victims of crimes of domestic violence must be taken
through hybrid means unless the counsel for the defendant can provide a safe and
secure location for a statement to be taken in person.
(4) If the State cannot locate the named victim to provide notice and subpoena
required under this section, the court shall consider that failure as a failure to appear
by a witness under paragraph D.
For the purposes of this paragraph, "hybrid means" means the use of telephone, Internet
or other remote audio and video communication technologies to conduct hearings or
Page 1 - 132LR0876(01)

412 other judicial proceedings at which one or more, but not all, attorneys, parties and
423 witnesses participate without being present in the same physical location as the court;
C. After the statement is taken, the defendant shall file a confirmation that the statement
was taken;
D. If a person who has been served a notice of statement and a subpoena fails to appear
or provide the requested information or materials, the defendant may file a motion
requesting the court to issue an order barring that person from appearing as a witness
in the case on any topic described in the notice of statement; and
E. At any time during the taking of the statement, a person may terminate the statement
if the examination is being conducted in bad faith or in such a manner as to
unreasonably annoy, embarrass or oppress the person. The defendant may file a motion
to have the court order a person to resume the statement. The defendant bears the
burden of proving to the court by a preponderance of the evidence that the examination
was not being conducted in such a manner as to unreasonably annoy, embarrass or
oppress the person. If the statement has been terminated, the statement may be resumed
thereafter only upon an order of the court in which the action is pending.
4. Remedy. The following remedies are available under this section.
A. A court that receives a request under subsection 3, paragraph D for an order barring
a person from appearing as a witness shall schedule a hearing to determine:
(1) Whether the potential witness was served the notice of statement and subpoena;
and
(2) Whether the potential witness appeared as required by the notice of statement.
B. If the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that a properly served person did
not appear, the court shall issue an order barring that potential witness from any future
testimony in the pending matter.
C. If a person terminates a statement under subsection 3, paragraph E, the defendant
may move to have the person barred from appearing as a witness. The court shall
schedule a hearing on the motion to determine if the statement was being conducted in
bad faith or in such a manner as to unreasonably annoy, embarrass or oppress the
person. If a court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the statement was not
being conducted in bad faith or in such a manner as to unreasonably annoy, embarrass
or oppress the person, the court shall issue an order barring that person from appearing
as a witness in the pending matter.
D. Any person who is barred from appearing as a witness under paragraph B or C may
not appear as a witness in any future criminal proceedings involving the same alleged
conduct.
5. No contact order. This section and the procedure under this section may not be
construed to modify an order of a court prohibiting contact between a defendant and a
named person in that order.